Utah statutes.
70A-9a-402.    Secured party not obligated on contract of debtor or in tort.
The existence of a security interest, agricultural lien, or authority given to
a debtor to dispose of or use collateral, without more, does not subject a
secured party to liability in contract or tort for the debtor's acts or
omissions.
